Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.420

Down syndrome—Parent information.

A nurse who provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under RCW 43.70.738 at the time the nurse provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

[ 2016 c 70 s 7.]